Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 9 Initiatives, Referenda, and Constitutional Amendments
7-9-111. Determination of sufficiency of petition — Corrections.

(a)

The Secretary of State shall ascertain and declare the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures submitted on each statewide initiative petition and each statewide referendum petition within thirty (30) days after it is filed.

(b)

The Secretary of State may contract with the various county clerks for their assistance in verifying the signatures on petitions. The county clerk shall return the petitions to the Secretary of State within ten (10) days.

(c)

If the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition is found to be sufficient, the Secretary of State shall certify and record the finding and perform such other duties relating thereto as are required by law.

(d)(1)

If the signatures submitted on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are found to be insufficient, the Secretary of State shall forthwith notify the sponsors in writing, through their designated agent, and shall set forth his or her reasons for so finding. When the notice is delivered, the sponsors shall have thirty (30) days in which to do any or all of the following:

(A)

Solicit and obtain additional signatures; or

(B)

Submit proof to show that the rejected signatures or some of them are good and should be counted.

(2)

Any amendments and corrections shall not materially change the purpose and effect of the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition. No change shall be made in the measure.

(3)

The Secretary of State shall ascertain and declare the sufficiency or insufficiency of additional signatures submitted by the sponsors under this subsection within thirty (30) days of the filing of the supplemental petitions.

(e)(1)

To assist the Secretary of State in ascertaining the sufficiency or insufficiency of each statewide initiative petition and each statewide referendum petition, all county clerks shall furnish at cost to the Secretary of State a single alphabetical list of all registered voters in their respective counties. The list shall be provided at least four (4) months before the election, and an updated list shall be provided at cost by September 1 in the year of the election. The list shall include the date of birth of each registered voter.

(2)

The State Board of Election Commissioners, upon the request of the county clerk, may grant a waiver from this provision if the board determines that the county clerk is unable to provide the list within the time required.

(f)(1)

A person filing statewide initiative petitions or statewide referendum petitions with the Secretary of State shall bundle the petitions by county and shall file an affidavit stating the number of petitions and the total number of signatures being filed.

(2)

If signatures were obtained by paid canvassers, the person filing the petitions under this subsection shall also submit the following:

(A)

A statement identifying the paid canvassers by name; and

(B)

A statement signed by the sponsor indicating that the sponsor:

(i)

Provided a copy of the most recent edition of the Secretary of State's initiatives and referenda handbook to each paid canvasser before the paid canvasser solicited signatures; and

(ii)

Explained the requirements under Arkansas law for obtaining signatures on an initiative or referendum petition to each paid canvasser before the paid canvasser solicited signatures.

(g)

All county initiative and referendum elections shall be held in accordance with the provisions of §14-14-917.

(h)

Municipal referendum petition measures shall be submitted to the electors at a regular general election unless the petition expressly calls for a special election. If the date set by the petition does not allow sufficient time to comply with election procedures, then the city or town council shall fix the date for any special election on the referendum measure. The date of any special election shall be set in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq. but in no event more than one hundred twenty (120) calendar days after the date of certification of sufficiency by the municipal clerk.

(i)(1)

When a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition is submitted to the Secretary of State for determination of the sufficiency of the signatures, the Secretary of State shall submit the ballot title and popular name of the proposed measure to the board for certification as required by Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1.

(2)

The board shall determine whether to certify the ballot title and popular name submitted for a proposed measure within thirty (30) days after the ballot title and popular name are submitted by the Secretary of State under subdivision (i)(1) of this section.

(3)

If the board determines that the ballot title and popular name, and the nature of the issue, is presented in a manner that is not misleading and not designed in such a manner that a vote “FOR” the issue would be a vote against the matter or viewpoint that the voter believes himself or herself to be casting a vote for, or, conversely, that a vote “AGAINST” an issue would be a vote for a viewpoint that the voter is against, the ballot title and popular name of the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition shall be certified to the Secretary of State to be placed upon the ballot if the signatures on the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are determined to be sufficient.

(4)(A)

If the board
determines that the ballot title or popular name, or the nature of the issue, is presented in such a manner that the ballot title or popular name would be misleading or designed in such manner that a vote “FOR” the issue would be a vote against the matter or viewpoint that the voter believes himself or herself to be casting a vote for, or, conversely, that a vote “AGAINST” an issue would be a vote for a viewpoint that the voter is against, the board of
shall:

(i)

Not certify the ballot title and popular name;

(ii)

(a)

Notify the sponsors in writing, through their designated agent, that the ballot title and popular name were not certified and set forth its reasons for so finding.

(b)

If the ballot title and popular name are not certified, the sponsor shall not submit a redesigned ballot title or popular name to the board; and

(iii)

Notify the Secretary of State that the ballot title and popular name were not certified.

(B)

If the ballot title and popular name are not certified under subdivision (i)(4)(A) of this section, the Secretary of State shall declare the proposed measure insufficient for inclusion on the ballot for the election at which the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition would be considered.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-210; Acts 1989, No. 280, § 5; 1991, No. 1094, § 1; 1991, No. 1153, § 1; 1997, No. 646, § 7; 1997, No. 1145, § 1; 2005, No. 2145, § 15; 2007, No. 1049, § 30; 2009, No. 1480, § 46; 2013, No. 1413, §§ 13-15; 2015, No. 1219, § 2; 2019, No. 376, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§7-11-201 et seq.”
for “§7-5-103(b)” in the last sentence of (h).

The 2013 amendment added (a)(3), (d)(3) and (f)(2).

The 2015 amendment deleted former (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); inserted “the signatures submitted on” in (a); substituted “statewide initiative petition and each statewide referendum petition” for “initiative and referendum petition” in (a) and made similar changes throughout the section; redesignated former (a)(2) as (b), and deleted former (b); substituted “signatures submitted on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are” for “petition is” in the introductory language of (d)(1); deleted (d)(1)(C); deleted “except to correct apparent typographical errors or omissions” at the end of (d)(2); added (i); and made stylistic changes.

7-9-112. Right of review.

(a)

If the Secretary of State determines that the signatures submitted on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are insufficient or the State Board of Election Commissioners does not certify the ballot title or popular name of a proposed measure resulting in the Secretary of State’s finding the proposed measure insufficient, the following persons may petition the Supreme Court to determine if the signatures submitted on the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are sufficient or if the ballot title or popular name of the proposed measure should be certified:

(1)

The sponsor of the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition; or

(2)

A registered voter.

(b)

The Supreme Court shall act expeditiously to review the sufficiency of the signatures or the certification of the ballot title or popular name in a timely manner and shall make every effort to reach a decision in advance of the election at which the proposed measure would be considered.

(c)(1)(A)

If the Supreme Court decides that the signatures submitted on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are sufficient, the Supreme Court shall order the Secretary of State to certify the sufficiency for placing the proposed measure on the election ballot if the ballot title and popular name are sufficient.

(B)

If the Supreme Court decides that the ballot title and popular name should be certified, the Supreme Court shall order the board to certify the ballot title and popular name to the Secretary of State, who shall declare the proposed measure sufficient to be placed upon the ballot if the signatures on the statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition are sufficient.

(2)

On a proper showing that the signatures are not sufficient or the ballot title or popular name should not be certified, the Supreme Court may enjoin the Secretary of State from certifying the proposed measure for inclusion on the ballot for the election at which the proposed measure would be considered or, in the event that the proposed measure will appear on the election ballot, from canvassing and certifying the vote on the proposed measure.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-211; Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 16; 2019, No. 376, § 10.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

7-9-113. Publication of notice.

(a)(1)

The Secretary of State shall be charged with the duty of letting contracts for publishing notices as authorized in this section.

(2)(A)

For measures proposed by petition, the petition sponsor shall reimburse the cost of publication to the Secretary of State within thirty (30) calendar days of notification of the final costs for publication.

(B)

The Secretary of State shall provide the sponsor of the measure a complete cost breakdown including the:

(i)

Number of locations where the measure was published;

(ii)

Number of times the measure was published;

(iii)

Dates the measure was published; and

(iv)

Costs for publishing the measure.

(C)(i)

The reimbursement shall be placed by the Secretary of State into the Mandatory Publication Reimbursement Fund.

(ii)

Funds shall be transferred from time to time from the Mandatory Publication Reimbursement Fund to the State Central Services Fund as refunds for costs associated with mandatory publications.

(b)(1)

Before the election at which any proposed or referred measure is to be voted upon by the people, notice shall be published in two (2) weekly issues of some newspaper in each county as is provided by law.

(2)(A)

Publication of the notice for amendments proposed by the General Assembly shall commence six (6) months before the election.

(B)

Publication of the notice for all other measures shall commence eight (8) weeks before the election.

(c)(1)

For amendments proposed by the General Assembly, at least one (1) notice shall:

(A)

Contain the number, the popular name, the ballot title, and a complete text of the amendment to be submitted; and

(B)

Be published in a camera-ready format in a type no smaller than 10-point type.

(2)

For all other proposed measures or amendments, at least one (1) notice shall:

(A)

Contain the number, the popular name, and the ballot title of the measure to be submitted;

(B)

Reference a website where the full text of the measure is published; and

(C)

Be published in a camera-ready format in a type no smaller than 10-point type.

(d)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, in connection with notice of the proposed measure, to give notice in the same newspapers that each elector on depositing his or her ballot at the election shall vote for or against the measure.

History.

Acts 1879, No. 80, § 6, p. 128; C. & M. Dig., § 1473; Pope's Dig., § 1771; Acts 1943, No. 195, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-212, 2-213; Acts 1991, No. 798, § 1; 1991, No. 1094, § 2; 1991, No. 1153, § 2; 1997, No. 646, § 8; 2017, No. 982, § 1; 2019, No. 898, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); added (a)(2); rewrote (c); and, in (d), substituted “notice of” for “a copy of” and substituted “measure” for “amendment” twice.

The 2019 amendment redesignated (a)(2)(C) as (a)(2)(C)(i); and added (a)(2)(C)(ii).

Cross References.

Constitutional amendments and other questions to be posted before election, §7-5-206.

7-9-114. Abstract of proposed measure.

(a)

The Attorney General shall prepare a concise abstract of the contents of each statewide initiative and referendum measure proposed under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 7, and he or she shall transmit it to the Secretary of State not less than twenty (20) days before the election.

(b)

Not less than eighteen (18) days before the election, the Secretary of State shall transmit a certified copy of the abstract to the county boards of election commissioners, who shall cause copies to be printed and posted conspicuously at all polling places in the county for the information of the voters.

(c)

The cost of printing copies of the abstracts shall be borne by the counties as a regular expense of the election.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 47, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-225 — 2-227; 2013, No. 1126, § 16.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “less” for “fewer” in (b).

7-9-115. Furnishing ballot title and popular name to election commissioners.

Not less than eighteen (18) days before the election, the Secretary of State shall furnish the State Board of Election Commissioners and county boards of election commissioners a certified copy of the ballot title and popular name for each proposed measure and each referred act to be voted upon at the ensuing election.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, §§ 8, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-216, 2-217; Acts 1997, No. 646, § 9.

7-9-116. Captions and designations of numbered issues.

(a)

The Secretary of State shall fix and declare the number of the issue by which state measures shall be designated on the ballot.

(b)

Each state measure shall be identified with the issue number designated by the Secretary of State.

(c)

Measures proposed by initiative petition shall be captioned, “CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT (OR ACT) PROPOSED BY PETITION OF THE PEOPLE”.

(d)

Measures referred to a vote by petition shall be captioned, “MEASURE REFERRED BY ORDER OF THE PEOPLE”.

(e)

Measures referred to a vote by the General Assembly shall be captioned, “CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT (OR OTHER MEASURE) REFERRED TO THE PEOPLE BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY”.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-216; Acts 2009, No. 281, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (a) and (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly inserted “CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT (OR ACT)”in (c); inserted “MEASURE” in (d); and inserted “CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT (OR OTHER MEASURE)” in (e).

7-9-117. Ballot form.

(a)

It shall be the duty of the county board of election commissioners in each county to cause each title and popular name to be printed upon the official ballot to be used in the election at which the measure is to be voted upon, in the manner certified by the Secretary of State.

(b)

The title and popular name shall be stated plainly, followed by these words:

“FOR ISSUE NO . “AGAINST ISSUE NO .”

Click to view form.

(c)(1)

In arranging the ballot titles on the ballot, the county board of election commissioners shall place each measure separate and apart from others.

(2)

Each statewide measure shall be designated on the ballot as an issue, and the issues shall be numbered consecutively beginning with “Issue 1” and in the following order:

(A)

Constitutional amendments proposed by the General Assembly, if any;

(B)

Initiated constitutional amendments, if any;

(C)

Statewide initiated acts, if any;

(D)

Referred acts of the General Assembly, if any;

(E)

Questions referred by the General Assembly, if any; and

(F)

Other measures that may be referred, if any.

(3)

The ballot titles of measures submitted by municipalities, counties, and other political subdivisions that may submit ballot measures to the people shall be:

(A)

Placed separate and apart on the ballot from the ballot titles of statewide measures and from other ballot titles of measures submitted by municipalities, counties, and other political subdivisions; and

(B)

Numbered consecutively for each political subdivision in the following order:

(i)

Initiated local measures, if any;

(ii)

Referred local measures, if any; and

(iii)

Other measures that may be referred, if any.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, §§ 8, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-216, 2-217; Acts 2009, No. 281, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “order and” preceding “manner” in (a); in (b), substituted “FOR ISSUE NO .....” for “FOR PROPOSED INITIATIVE (OR REFERRED) AMENDMENT (OR ACT) NO .....” and substituted “AGAINST ISSUE N0 .....” for “AGAINST PROPOSED INITIATIVE (OR REFERRED) AMENDMENT (OR ACT) NO .....”; and inserted (c)(2) and (3).

7-9-118. Failure to place proposal on ballot — Manner of voting.

If any election board shall fail or refuse to submit any proposal after its sufficiency has been duly certified, the qualified electors of the county may vote for or against the measure by writing or stamping on their ballot the proposed ballot title, followed by the word “FOR” or “AGAINST”. All votes so cast, if otherwise legal, shall be canvassed, counted, and certified.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-217.

7-9-119. Counting, canvass, and return of votes — Proclamation of result — Effective date.

(a)

The vote on each measure shall be counted, tabulated, and returned by the proper precinct election officials to the county board of election commissioners in each county at the time and in the manner the vote for candidates for state and county officers is tabulated, canvassed, and returned.

(b)

An abstract of all votes cast on any measure shall be certified by the county board of election commissioners and delivered or postmarked to the Secretary of State no earlier than forty-eight (48) hours and no later than fifteen (15) calendar days after the election is held.

(c)

It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to canvass the returns on each measure not later than ten (10) days thereafter and to certify the result to the Governor and to the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(d)(1)(A)

The Governor shall thereupon issue a proclamation showing the total number of votes cast and the number cast for and the number cast against each measure and shall declare the measure adopted or rejected, as the facts appear.

(B)

If the Governor declares any measure adopted, it shall be in full force and effect thirty (30) days after the election unless otherwise provided in the measure.

(2)

However, amendments to the Arkansas Constitution shall also be declared adopted or rejected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, as is provided by the Arkansas Constitution.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-218; Acts 1997, No. 646, § 10; 2005, No. 1677, § 6.

Cross References.

Measures in effect 30 days after election, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1.

Returns and canvass of votes, §7-5-701 et seq.

7-9-120. Printing of approved measures with general laws — Certification of city ordinances.

(a)

The Secretary of State shall cause every measure approved by the people to be printed with the general laws enacted by the next ensuing session of the General Assembly with the date of the Governor's proclamation declaring the same to have been approved by the people.

(b)

However, city ordinances approved by the people shall only be certified by the Secretary of State to the city clerk or recorder of the municipality for which the ordinance has been approved, who shall immediately record the same as he or she is required by law to record other ordinances of the municipality.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 9768; Pope's Dig., § 13288; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-205.

7-9-121. Contest of returns and certification.

(a)

The right to contest the returns and certification of the votes cast upon any measure is expressly conferred upon any twenty-five (25) qualified electors of the state.

(b)

Any contest may be brought in the Pulaski County Circuit Court and shall be conducted under any rules and regulations as may be made and promulgated by the Supreme Court. However, the complaint shall be filed within sixty (60) days after the certification of the vote thereon, and the contestants shall not be required to make bond for the costs.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-222; Acts 2005, No. 67, § 25.

7-9-122. Adoption of conflicting measures.

If two (2) or more conflicting measures shall be approved by a majority of the votes severally cast for and against the measures at the same election, the measure receiving the greatest number of affirmative votes shall become law.

History.

Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 14; C. & M. Dig., § 9776; Pope's Dig., § 13295; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-221; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 10.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const., Amend. 7, which amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 1, repealed Acts 1911 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 2 to the extent of any conflict therewith.

7-9-123. Preservation of records.

All petitions, notices, certificates, or other documentary evidence of procedural steps taken in submitting any measure shall be filed and preserved. Petitions with signatures shall be retained for two (2) years and thereafter destroyed. The measure and the certificates relating thereto shall be recorded in a permanent record and duly attested by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 195, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-224; Acts 1997, No. 897, § 1.

7-9-124. Voter registration signature imaging system — Creation of fund.

(a)

There is hereby established in the office of the Secretary of State a voter registration signature imaging system, and the Secretary of State is authorized to acquire and maintain the necessary equipment and facilities to accommodate the system.

(b)

The Division of Information Systems shall cooperate with and assist the Secretary of State in determining the computer equipment and software needed in the office of the Secretary of State for the voter registration signature imaging system.

(c)

There is hereby created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Voter Registration Signature Imaging System Fund”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1285, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 1104, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6060.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b).

7-9-125. Definition — Prohibition of profit — Penalties — Freedom of information.

(a)

As used in this section, “property” means both real and personal property and includes without limitation both tangible and intangible property.

(b)(1)

No person who is a sponsor of an initiative petition, referendum petition, or constitutional amendment which proposes the sale of property owned by a municipality or county shall receive anything of value as a result of the passage of the act sponsored by the person.

(2)

A sponsor of an initiative petition, referendum petition, or constitutional amendment which proposes the sale of property owned by a municipality or county shall file, within sixty (60) calendar days of the election at which the initiative, referendum, or constitutional amendment has been voted upon, with the Secretary of State an accounting of all expenditures by the sponsor in connection with the petition or amendment.

(3)

No person shall directly or indirectly benefit from sponsorship of a petition or amendment which proposes the sale of property owned by a municipality or county by contracting sponsorship activities to any business enterprise in which the sponsor has a substantial interest.

(4)

Nothing in this act shall prohibit the circulation of petitions or compensation to persons who circulate the petitions.

(c)(1)(A)

If a sponsor violates any provision of subsection (b) of this section, the sponsor shall be fined an amount equal to twice the amount of the person's personal gain.

(B)

The fine shall be paid to the state, municipality, or county in which the petition or amendment was voted upon.

(2)

This section shall be enforced by the:

(A)

City attorney of the municipality;

(B)

Prosecuting attorney of the county; or

(C)

Attorney General of this state.

(d)

The expense reports filed by the sponsor of the petition shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1100, §§ 1-3;
2013, No. 1413, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a).

7-9-126. Count of signatures.

(a)

Upon the initial filing of an initiative petition or referendum petition, the official charged with verifying the signatures shall:

(1)

Perform an initial count of the signatures; and

(2)

Determine whether the petition contains, on its face and before verification of the signatures of registered voters, the designated number of signatures required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutory law in order to certify the measure for the election ballot.

(b)

A petition part and all signatures appearing on the petition part shall not be counted for any purpose by the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial count of signatures, if one (1) or more of the following is true:

(1)

The petition is not an original petition, including without limitation a petition that is photocopied or is a facsimile transmission;

(2)

The petition does not conform to the original draft filed under §7-9-107;

(3)

The petition lacks the signature, printed name, and residence address of the canvasser or is signed by more than one (1) canvasser;

(4)(A)

The canvasser is a paid canvasser whose name and the information required under §7-9-601 were not submitted or updated by the sponsor to the Secretary of State before the petitioner signed the petition.

(B)

A canvasser is a paid canvasser if he or she is paid money or anything of value for soliciting signatures before or after the signatures are obtained;

(5)

The canvasser verification:

(A)

Is not notarized;

(B)

Is notarized by more than one (1) notary;

(C)

Lacks a notary signature or a notary seal; or

(D)

Lacks a legible notary signature or a legible notary seal;

(6)

The canvasser verification is dated earlier than the date on which a petitioner signed the petition;

(7)

The petition fails to comply with §7-9-104 or §7-9-105, including the lack of the exact popular name or ballot title for a statewide initiative, a discrepancy in the text of the initiated or referred measure, or the lack of an enacting clause in a statewide petition for an initiated act; or

(8)

The petition part has a material defect that, on its face, renders the petition part invalid.

(c)

The following signatures shall not be counted for any purpose by the official charged with verifying the signatures, including the initial count of signatures:

(1)

A signature that is not an original signature;

(2)

A signature that is obviously not that of the purported petitioner;

(3)

A signature that is illegible;

(4)

A signature that is not accompanied by personally identifying information;

(5)

A signature for which the corresponding printed name, address, birth date, or date of signing is written by someone other than the signer except under circumstances of disability of the signer;

(6)

A signature obtained before the filing of the original draft for circulation under §7-9-107; and

(7)

A signature that has any other material defect that, on its face, renders the signature invalid.

(d)

If the initial count of signatures under this section is less than the designated number of signatures required by the Arkansas Constitution and statutory law in order to certify the measure for the ballot and the deadline for filing petitions has passed, the official charged with verifying the signatures shall declare the petition insufficient and shall not accept and file any additional signatures to cure the insufficiency of the petition on its face.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 18; 2015, No. 1219, § 3; 2019, No. 376, § 11.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment deleted former (b)(7) and redesignated former (b)(8) as (b)(7).

The 2019 amendment inserted the first occurrence of “petition” in the introductory language of (a); inserted (b)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “or updated” in (b)(4)(A); redesignated part of (b)(5) as (b)(5)(A) through (b)(5)(C); added (b)(5)(D); deleted “approved by the Attorney General” following “ballot title” in (b)(7); redesignated part of (c)(3) as (c)(4); redesignated former (c)(4) as (c)(5); inserted “or date of signing” in (c)(5); inserted (c)(6); redesignated former (c)(5) as (c)(7); and made stylistic changes.

Subchapter 2

— Legislative Proposal of Constitutional Amendments

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, §
1 provided: “Legislative findings.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Through Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, the people of Arkansas have reserved to themselves the power to propose legislative measures, laws, and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution and to enact or reject the proposed measures, laws, and amendments at the polls independently of the General Assembly;

“(2)

The citizens of this state have an expectation that their right of initiative and referendum will be respected and that the process of gathering signatures of registered voters will be free of fraud, forgery, and other illegal conduct by sponsors, canvassers, notaries, and petitioners;

“(3)

Sponsors and paid canvassers may have an incentive to knowingly submit forged or otherwise invalid signatures in order to obtain additional time to gather signatures and submit supplemental petitions;

“(4)

In 2012, sponsors of four (4) separate initiative petitions submitted petitions to the Secretary of State containing over two hundred ninety-eight thousand (298,000) purported signatures of registered voters;

“(5)

Of the four petitions submitted, none had an initial validity rate in excess of fifty-six percent (56%), and three (3) of the petitions had an initial validity rate below thirty-one percent (31%); and

“(6)

Of the three petitions with the lowest initial validity rate, there were widespread instances of apparent fraud, forgery, and false statements in the signature-gathering process.

“(b)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if an effort is not made to address these issues:

“(1)

Untrained paid canvassers will continue to obtain and submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures; and

“(2)

Unscrupulous sponsors and canvassers will continue to have an incentive to submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures and make false statements to the Secretary of State.

“(c)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if this act becomes law:

“(1)

Sponsors and canvassers of proposed initiative measures will be held more accountable for their actions in gathering signatures from registered voters; and

“(2)

The earlier determination of the insufficiency of petitions rife with false statements, forged signatures, and otherwise facially invalid signatures will result in less confusion and frustration with the initiative process.

“(d)

For the reasons stated in this section, the General Assembly finds that passage of this act will make sponsors and canvassers more accountable to the people of this state, facilitate the initiative process, conserve state resources, and help to restore the confidence and trust of the people in the initiative process.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1923, No. 279, § 3: Emergency declared.

Acts 1927, No. 206, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 22: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing procedures for initiating and referring state laws and ordinances pursuant to Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution and state statutes are inadequate to prevent fraudulent practices by sponsors and canvassers in obtaining ballot access; that this act addresses these inadequacies; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent fraudulent practices because petition campaigns are either being conducted at the present time or may be conducted immediately upon the adjournment of the General Assembly with respect to either initiated or referred measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 376, § 14: Mar. 8, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends the process for circulating initiative petitions and referendum petitions; and that the provisions of this act should become effective immediately so that its provisions apply to all petitions circulated after the passage of the act to avoid confusion in petition circulation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”. The emergency clause for Acts 2019, No. 376 was held to be defective in Safe Surgery Ark. v. Thurston, 2019 Ark. 403.

7-9-201. Proposal and vote.

Amendments to the Arkansas Constitution shall be proposed in either branch of the General Assembly in the form of a joint resolution, which shall be read in full on three (3) several days in each house unless the rules be suspended by two-thirds (2/3) of each house, when it may be read a second or third time on the same day. On the final passage of the proposed amendment through each house, the vote shall be taken by yeas and nays, and the names of the persons voting for and against it be entered on the journal. No amendment shall be proposed unless it is agreed to by a majority of all the members elected to each house.

History.

Acts 1879, No. 80, § 1, p. 128; C. & M. Dig., § 1467; Pope's Dig., § 1768; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-101.

Cross References.

Constitutional amendments proposed by people through initiative, §7-9-101 et seq.

7-9-202. Enrollment and filing.

When any joint resolution proposing an amendment to the Arkansas Constitution shall have passed each house as prescribed in §7-9-201, it shall be enrolled and signed by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1879, No. 80, § 2, p. 128; C. & M. Dig., § 1468; Acts 1923, No. 279, § 1; 1927, No. 206, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 1769; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-102.

7-9-203. Entry on journals.

The proposed amendment shall be entered on the journals of each house, with the yeas and nays.

History.

Acts 1879, No. 80, § 5, p. 128; C. & M. Dig., § 1472; Pope's Dig., § 1770; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-103.

7-9-204. Ballot titles and popular names of constitutional amendments proposed by the legislature.

The General Assembly may designate in the joint resolution proposing an amendment to the Arkansas Constitution the popular name and ballot title of the amendment for the election ballot.

History.

Acts 2001, No 150, §
1;
2013, No. 1413, § 19.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

7-9-205. Challenges to constitutional amendments proposed by the General Assembly.

If the General Assembly passes a joint resolution proposing an amendment to the Arkansas Constitution, a qualified elector may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction at any time after the passage of the joint resolution challenging the sufficiency of the joint resolution, including without limitation the:

(1)

Text of the proposed amendment;

(2)

Ballot title of the proposed amendment; and

(3)

Popular name of the proposed amendment.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 376, § 12.

Subchapter 3

— Constitutional Conventions

Effective Dates.

Acts 2011, No. 1185, § 21: Oct. 2, 2011.

7-9-301. Calling constitutional convention — Majority vote.

(a)

When a majority of the qualified electors of this state voting on the issue at a general election shall vote for the holding of a constitutional convention, the convention shall be held. The delegates thereto shall be selected and qualified as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

Whenever a majority of the electors voting on the question vote against the holding of a constitutional convention, no convention shall be held. Delegates to the proposed convention elected at the election shall have and exercise no power or authority and shall perform no functions by virtue of their election as delegates.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, §§ 1, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-104, 2-109.

7-9-302. Delegate qualifications — Election date.

(a)

At the same general election at which a vote on the calling of a constitutional convention shall be taken, delegates to the convention shall be elected.

(b)

Candidates for the office of delegate to the constitutional convention shall possess the qualifications required by law for a member of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly, and they shall be qualified electors of the district from which elected.

(c)

The election of delegates to the convention shall be on a nonpartisan basis, and no candidate shall designate political party affiliation at the time he or she files for election.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-105.